Utah statutes.
32A-10-302.   Application requirements.
(1) (a)  A person seeking a temporary special event beer permit shall file a
written application with the department in a form prescribed by the
department.
(b)  The application required by this section shall be accompanied by:
(i)  a permit fee of $75, which:
(A)  is refundable if a permit is not granted; and
(B)  shall be returned to the applicant with the application if the permit is
not granted;
(ii) (A)  written consent of the local authority; or
(B)  a temporary permit granted by the local authority under Section
32A-10-101;
(iii)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-10-305;
(iv)  the times, dates, location, estimated attendance, nature, and purpose of
the temporary special event;
(v)  a description or floor plan designating:
(A)  the area in which the applicant proposes that beer be stored;
(B)  the site from which the applicant proposes that beer be sold or served;
and
(C)  the area in which the applicant proposes that beer be allowed to be
consumed;
(vi)  a statement of the purpose of the temporary special event;
(vii)  a signed consent form stating that authorized representatives of the
commission, department, or any law enforcement officers will have unrestricted
right to enter the premises during the temporary special event;
(viii)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or
limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or
persons signing the application are authorized to so act on behalf of the
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and
(ix)  any other information the commission or department may require.
(2)  An applicant need not meet the requirements of Subsection (1)(b)(i),
(ii), or (iii) if the applicant is:
(a)  a state agency; or
(b)  a political subdivision of the state including:
(i)  a county; or
(ii)  a municipality.
